New Jersey, session 221, S4498.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    There is established in the Executive Branch of State government a principal department which shall be known as the Department of State Police. The department shall assume the functions, powers, and duties of the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety. 2.    The executive and administrative head of the department shall be the Commissioner of State Police, who shall be a person qualified by training and experience to direct the work of the department. The commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, and shall serve during the term of the appointing Governor and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.  However,  the person serving as Superintendent of State Police on the effective date of this act shall assume the office of Commissioner of State Police and shall hold that office for the unexpired period of the term for which the Superintendent was appointed or until a successor is appointed and qualifies. 3.    a.  Pursuant to the "State Agency Transfer Act," P.L.1971, c.375 (C.52:14D-1 et seq.), the functions, powers, duties, and employees of  the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety are hereby  transferred to the Department of State Police established by this act. b.    The functions, powers, and duties of the Superintendent of State Police in the Division of State Police are hereby transferred to and vested in the Commissioner of State Police established by this act. 4.    a.  Whenever the term "Division of State Police" occurs or any reference is made thereto in any law, contract or document, the same shall be deemed to mean or refer to the Department of State Police established by this act. b.    Whenever the term "Superintendent of State Police" occurs or any reference is made in any law, contract, or document, the same shall be deemed to mean or refer to the Commissioner of State Police established by this act. 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month following enactment.